South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3434.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 9-1-1790(A)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) The earnings limitation imposed pursuant to this item does not apply if the member meets at least one of the following qualifications: (a) the member retired before January 2, 2013; (b) the member has attained the age of sixty-two years at retirement; or (c) compensation received by the retired member from the covered employer is for service in a public office filled by the appointment of the Governor and with confirmation by the Senate, by appointment or election by the General Assembly, or by election of the qualified electors of the applicable jurisdiction.; or (d) compensation received for employment as a school bus driver for a public school district by a member who retired from the system before January 1, 2025. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----